Florida, session 2026, SB1602.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 38 39 Section 1.âSection 83.684, Florida Statutes, is created to 40 read: 41 83.684âHomes for Veterans Property Management Incentive 42 Pilot Program.â 43 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âHomes for Veterans 44 Property Management Incentive Pilot Program Act.â 45 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 46 (a)ââCorporationâ means the Florida Housing Finance 47 Corporation. 48 (b)ââHUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing programâ means 49 a program that combines the United States Department of Housing 50 and Urban Developmentâs housing choice voucher rental assistance 51 for homeless veterans with case management and clinical services 52 provided by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. 53 (c)ââPilot programâ means the Homes for Veterans Property 54 Management Incentive Pilot Program. 55 (d)ââVeteranâ has the same meaning as in s. 1.01(14). 56 (3)âThe Homes for Veterans Property Management Incentive 57 Pilot Program is established in Broward, Escambia, Hillsborough, 58 and Santa Rosa Counties to provide eligible landlords with 59 incentives to lease eligible dwelling units to veterans who are 60 participating in the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing 61 program. Implementation of this pilot program is subject to 62 annual legislative appropriation. The corporation, in 63 consultation with the local public housing authority and case 64 managers assigned to veterans by the United States Department of 65 Veteransâ Affairs, shall establish and oversee the document 66 requirements and all processes of the pilot program. The 67 corporationâs responsibilities under this section are limited to 68 program administration, including rulemaking, oversight, and 69 establishing and executing contracts with one or more local 70 public housing authorities, contracted program administrators, 71 or other public or nonprofit entities that have experience 72 administering the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing 73 program, supportive housing, or landlord mitigation programs to 74 perform intake, documentation review, and claim verification 75 functions to locally administer funds and to distribute funding 76 to the contracted program administrator for payment of approved 77 reimbursement requests. The corporation is not responsible for 78 maintaining eligibility files, tenancy records, or other case 79 level documentation for the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive 80 Housing program. Such functions shall be maintained by the 81 contracted program administrator. 82 (4)(a)âA landlord who enters into a rental agreement with 83 an eligible veteran may apply to a contracted program 84 administrator to request funding for the purpose of allowing a 85 landlord to hold a dwelling unit for a period of time, and still 86 be compensated for the time that the dwelling unit is vacant, 87 until the veteran is able to move into the dwelling unit. Such 88 funding provides proportional rent to eligible landlords for a 89 period of up to 45 days after the date the dwelling unit becomes 90 available or until the actual date that the veteran moves into 91 the dwelling unit, whichever is sooner. 92 (b)âTo apply for funding under paragraph (a), a landlord 93 must submit all required documentation to the contracted program 94 administrator within 60 days after the veteran moves into the 95 dwelling unit. The case manager assigned to the veteran shall 96 assist the contracted program administrator by facilitating 97 funding requests from landlords and documentation compliance. 98 The contracted program administrator shall maintain all 99 documentation required under this subsection and provide the 100 corporation with a certification of eligibility, tenancy dates, 101 and verified costs within the timeframe established by the 102 corporation by rule. At a minimum, a landlord shall submit 103 documentation to the contracted program administrator in the 104 form and manner established by the corporation. Required 105 supporting documentation necessary to confirm eligibility for 106 reimbursement and oversight shall be maintained by the entity 107 responsible for case management or rental assistance 108 administration in the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing 109 program. 110 (c)âThe corporation may rely on certifications, 111 determinations, and documentation provided by public housing 112 authorities, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, 113 providers of Supportive Services for Veteran Families, 114 continuums of care, or other entities responsible for 115 administering or supporting the functions of the HUD-Veterans 116 Affairs Supportive Housing program. The corporationâs reliance 117 on such certifications, determinations, and documentation 118 satisfies the corporationâs oversight and evaluation 119 responsibilities of the functions, activities, and outcomes for 120 the pilot program. 121 (5)(a)âIf a veteran moves out of the dwelling unit during 122 the first 12 months of a year-to-year rental agreement or after 123 the expiration of a rental agreement for any duration, the 124 landlord may apply to the contracted program administrator for 125 funding to cover property loss at the dwelling unit caused by 126 the veteran which exceeds the amount of the deposit money. The 127 landlord may apply for up to $2,000 beyond the deposit money. 128 (b)âTo apply for funding under paragraph (a), a landlord 129 must submit all required documentation to the contracted program 130 administrator within 60 days after the veteran moves out of the 131 dwelling unit. The case manager assigned to the veteran shall 132 assist the contracted program administrator by facilitating 133 funding requests from landlords and documentation compliance. 134 The contracted program administrator shall maintain all 135 documentation required under this subsection and provide the 136 corporation, within the timeframe established by rule, a 137 certification of eligibility, tenancy dates, verified damage 138 amounts, and verified costs. Required supporting documentation 139 necessary to confirm eligibility for reimbursement and oversight 140 shall be maintained by the entity responsible for case 141 management or rental assistance administration in the HUD 142 Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing program. 143 (c)âAfter the veteran vacates the dwelling unit, the 144 landlord shall provide the contracted program administrator a 145 copy of the move-out checklist with current photos of the 146 dwelling unit and a copy of the written notice provided to the 147 veteran by the landlord in accordance with s. 83.49(3)(a). 148 (d)âA landlord may apply for funding under paragraph (a) 149 only if the landlord previously applied for funding under 150 paragraph (4)(a). 151 (6)âFunding for the pilot program is limited, and the 152 corporation shall award funds on a first-come, first-served 153 basis. The corporation may suspend acceptance of applications 154 when available appropriations are fully obligated. The 155 corporation must notify contracted program administrators if 156 intake of applications is suspended and when intake of 157 applications is resumed. 158 (7)âThe corporation shall adopt rules to implement this 159 section. 160 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.